Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.400

Job skills program—Legislative declaration and policy.

The legislature declares that it is an important function of government to increase opportunities for gainful employment, to assist in promoting a productive and expanding economy, and to encourage the flow of business and industry support to educational institutions. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest of the state to encourage and facilitate the formation of cooperative relationships between business and industry and educational institutions which provide for the development and significant expansion of programs of skills training and education consistent with employment needs and to make interested individuals aware of the employment opportunities presented thereby. It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure that programs of skill training are available on a regional basis and are utilized by a variety of businesses and industries.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 21 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 21: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 21 s 12.]